Utah, session 2026, HB598.
Section 1. Section 26B-7-126 is enacted to read:26B-7-126. Uterine fibroid research and education.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Health care provider" means the same as that term is defined in Section 78B-3-403.(b)"Medical research organization" means an institution of higher education, a research organization, or a healthcare facility that conducts medical research:(i)that is approved by an institutional review board; and(ii)in accordance with applicable ethics requirements for human subject research.(c)(i)"Uterine fibroid" means a non-cancerous growth in or on the uterus.(ii)"Uterine fibroid" includes a leiomyoma or a myoma.(2)The department shall coordinate efforts related to research of and education about uterine fibroids.(3)The department's coordination efforts shall encourage:(a)research on:(i)how frequently individuals in the state are diagnosed with uterine fibroids;(ii)the ages at which individuals are diagnosed with, and treated for, uterine fibroids;(iii)health care services delivered to individuals in the state diagnosed with uterine fibroids;(iv)how many hysterectomies are performed:(A)as a treatment for uterine fibroids; or(B)for which uterine fibroids are a factor in performing the hysterectomy;(v)the availability of non-hysterectomy treatment options for individuals in the state diagnosed with uterine fibroids, including drugs and devices; and(vi)the impacts of uterine fibroids on reproductive health, including as a barrier to reproduction; and(b)data collection and data sharing related to the subjects described in Subsection (3)(a).(4)The department's coordination efforts shall include education for health care providers and patients about uterine fibroids to ensure individuals with symptomatic uterine fibroids receive appropriate treatment, including education about:(a)the availability and appropriateness of non-hysterectomy treatment options; and(b)the impacts of uterine fibroids on reproductive health, including as a barrier to reproduction.(5)In fulfilling the department's duties described in Subsections (2) through (4), the department may coordinate with medical research organizations in the state.(6)In accordance with Chapter 8, Part 5, Utah Health Data Authority, and other applicable laws, the department may enter into an agreement with medical research organizations in the state to share identifiable health data for the purpose of fulfilling the requirements of Subsection (3).(7)On or before November 1, 2028, and on or before November 1, 2029, the department shall report to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee on:(a)the department's coordination efforts related to research as described in Subsection (3)(a);(b)any findings related to the research topics described in Subsection (3)(a), including, in 2029, a comparison to any findings reported in 2028;(c)the department's coordination efforts related to education for health care providers and patients about uterine fibroids;(d)the department's recommendations, including policy and legislative recommendations; and(e)any other data or information the committee requests related to uterine fibroid research and education.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-2-226 is amended to read:63I-2-226. Repeal dates: Titles 26 through 26B.(1)Section 26B-1-420, Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(2)Subsection 26B-1-421(9)(a), regarding a report to the Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(3)Section 26B-1-423, Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program Advisory Committee -- Membership -- Compensation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2026.(4)Section 26B-2-243, Data collection and reporting requirements concerning incidents of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Subsection 26B-3-215(5), regarding reporting on coverage for in vitro fertilization and genetic testing, is repealed July 1, 2030.(6)Subsection 26B-4-201(5), regarding the Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(7)Subsection 26B-4-212(1)(b), regarding the Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(8)Section 26B-4-702, Creation of Utah Health Care Workforce Financial Assistance Program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(9)Subsection 26B-4-703(3)(b), regarding per diem and expenses for the Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 2026.(10)Subsection 26B-4-703(3)(c), regarding expenses for the Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(11)Subsection 26B-4-703(6)(b), regarding recommendations from the Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 2026.(12)Section 26B-5-117, Early childhood mental health support grant program, is repealed January 2, 2025.(13)Section 26B-5-302.5, Study concerning civil commitment and the Utah State Hospital, is repealed July 1, 2025.(14)Section 26B-6-414, Respite care services, is repealed July 1, 2025.(15)Section 26B-7-120, Invisible condition alert program education and outreach, is repealed  July 1, 2025.(16)Section 26B-7-126, Uterine fibroid research and education, is repealed July 1, 2030.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.